South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 40, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-40-250. A charter school authorized by either the South Carolina Public Charter School District or an institution of higher education must receive an additional one thousand dollars in per pupil funding from either the Department of Education or the authorizing institution of higher education. To qualify for the provisions of this section, an elementary, middle, or high school must be located in Allendale, Bamberg, Barnwell, Clarendon, Colleton, Darlington, Dillon, Hampton, Jasper, Lee, Marion, Marlboro, Orangeburg, Sumter, or Williamsburg county or include seventy-five percent or more pupils in poverty based on the statewide one hundred thirty-fifth day pupils in poverty index for the current academic year and for which the charter school received a rating of good or excellent on the academic achievement indicator on the South Carolina State Report Card for the previous academic year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----